Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8906
Minimum standard of valuation; applicability
to contracts; when.

For
accident and health insurance contracts issued on or after the operative date
of the valuation manual designated in subsection (2) of section 44-8908, the
standard prescribed in the valuation manual is the minimum standard of valuation
required under section 44-8904. For disability and sickness and accident insurance
contracts issued on or after the operative date defined in section 44-407.07
and prior to the operative date of the valuation manual, the minimum standard
of valuation is the standard adopted and promulgated by the director by rule
and regulation.

Laws 2014, LB755, § 6.